Washington statutes.
RCW 41.48.070

Employees may elect.

The governing body of any political subdivision having any coverage group, as the term is defined in title II of the social security act, not covered by a state or municipal retirement system may submit for an advisory vote to the members of such coverage group the question of whether they prefer coverage by federal old-age and survivors insurance or coverage by a state or municipal retirement system.

[ 1951 c 184 s 7.]